en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2017
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2017

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2017
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2017

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2017
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2017

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2016
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2016

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2016
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2016

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2016
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2016

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2016
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2016

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2016
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award ice cream maker of the year 2016

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2015
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2015

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2015
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2015

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2015
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2015

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2015
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2015

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2014
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best ice cream 2014

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2014
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award most innovative ice cream 2014

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2014
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best technical solution 2014

en: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2014
xx: International Ice Cream Consortium award best commercial solution 2014

en: MåBra recommends
xx: MåBra rekommenderar, Må bra rekommenderar
sv: MåBra rekommenderar, Må bra rekommenderar

xx: MåBra rekommenderar 2023
sv: MåBra rekommenderar 2023

xx: Råd & Rön, Rad & Ron
sv: Råd & Rön

xx: Råd & Rön: Bäst i test, Rad & Ron Bast i test
sv: Råd & Rön: Bäst i test